fr: Mécanisme de verrouillage du filet de fenêtre: Boucle à came; Levier; Sans loquet (fixe); Déverrouillage par sangle; Bouton-poussoir; Goupille rapide; Loquet rotatif; Boucle type ceinture de sécurité; Autre
sl-SI: Zapahnitveni mehanizem zaščitne mreže za okno: Zatezna zaponka; Ročica; Brez zapaha (fiksno); Sprostitev z vlečnim trakom; Pritisni gumb; Hitri zatič; Vrtljivi zapah; Zaponka v slogu varnostnega pasu; Drugo
pt-BR: Rede de janela mecanismo de trava: Fivela de mordente; Alavanca; Sem trinco (fixo); Desbloqueio por alça de puxar; Botão; Pino de liberação rápida; Trinco rotativo; Fivela estilo cinto de segurança; Outro
hu: Ablakháló zárómechanizmusa: Rögzítőcsat; Kar; Nincs retesz (rögzített); Húzópántos kioldó; Nyomógombos; Gyorskioldó csapszeg; Forgóretesz; Biztonsági öv típusú csat; Egyéb
zh-TW: 車窗網插扣機制: 凸輪扣; 槓桿; 無鎖扣 (固定式); 拉帶釋放; 按鈕; 快拆插銷; 旋轉鎖扣; 安全帶式扣環; 其他
de: Verriegelungsmechanismus des Fensternetzes: Klemmschloss; Hebel; Kein Verschluss (fest); Zugbandentriegelung; Druckknopf; Steckbolzen; Drehverschluss; Gurtschloss; Sonstige
ja: 窓網ラッチメカニズム: カムバックル; レバー; ラッチなし (固定); プルストラップリリース; プッシュボタン; クイックピン; ロータリーラッチ; シートベルトスタイルバックル; その他
pl: Mechanizm zatrzasku siatki okiennej: Klamra zaciskowa; Dźwignia; Bez zatrzasku (stałe); Zwalnianie pociągnięciem paska; Przycisk; Szybka zawleczka; Zatrzask obrotowy; Klamra w stylu pasa bezpieczeństwa; Inny
es: Mecanismo de cierre de la red de la ventana: Hebilla de leva; Palanca; Sin pestillo (fijo); Liberación de correa de tracción; Botón pulsador; Pasador rápido; Pestillo giratorio; Hebilla tipo cinturón de seguridad; Otro
th: กลไกตัวล็อคตาข่ายหน้าต่าง: ตัวล็อกแบบแคมบักเกิล; คันโยก; ไม่มีสลัก (ยึดติดตายตัว); ปลดด้วยสายรัด; ปุ่มกด; พินปลดเร็ว; สลักแบบหมุน; หัวเข็มขัดแบบเข็มขัดนิรภัย; อื่นๆ
el: Μηχανισμός κλειδώματος σίτας παραθύρου με μάνδαλο: Αγκράφα τύπου cam; Μοχλός; Χωρίς μάνταλο (σταθερό); Απασφάλιση με ιμάντα έλξης; Μπουτόν; Πείρος ταχείας απασφάλισης; Περιστροφικό μάνταλο; Αγκράφα τύπου ζώνης ασφαλείας; Άλλο
lt-LT: Lango tinklelio skląsčio mechanizmas: Svirtinė sagtis; Svirtis; Be užrakto (fiksuota); Atsegama patraukus dirželį; Mygtukas; Greito fiksavimo kaištis; Sukamasis užraktas; Saugos diržo tipo sagtis; Kita
sk-SK: Mechanizmus západky okennej sieťky: Spona s vačkou; Páčka; Bez západky (pevné); Uvoľnenie potiahnutím popruhu; Tlačidlo; Rýchloupínací kolík; Otočná západka; Spona v štýle bezpečnostného pásu; Iné
tr: Pencere ağı kilitleme mekanizması: Kam toka; Kol; Mandal yok (sabit); Çekme kayışlı serbest bırakma; Basmalı düğme; Hızlı pim; Döner mandal; Emniyet kemeri stili toka; Diğer
it: Meccanismo di chiusura della zanzariera per finestre: Fibbia a camma; Leva; Nessuna chiusura (fisso); Sblocco con cinghia a strappo; A pulsante; A perno rapido; Chiusura a rotazione; Fibbia tipo cintura di sicurezza; Altro
nl: Raamnet vergrendelingsmechanisme: Klemgesp; Hendel; Geen sluiting (vast); Trekkoord-ontgrendeling; Drukknop; Borgpen; Draaisluiting; Gordelsluiting; Overige
nb: Låsemekanisme for vindusnett: Klemspenne; Spak; Ingen lås (fast); Trekksnor-utløser; Trykknapp; Hurtigpinne; Roterende lås; Setebeltespenne; Annet
da: Låsemekanisme for vinduesnet: Klemspænde; Håndtag; Ingen lås (fastgjort); Trækstropudløser; Trykknap; Quick-pin; Drejelås; Spænde i sikkerhedssele-stil; Andet
ru: Механизм фиксации оконной сетки: Пряжка с кулачковым зажимом; Рычаг; Без защелки (фиксированная); Отстегивание натяжным ремнем; Кнопочный; Быстросъемный штифт; Поворотная защелка; Замок типа ремня безопасности; Другое
en: Window net latch mechanism: Cam buckle; Lever; No latch (fixed); Pull strap release; Push-button; Quick-pin; Rotary latch; Seatbelt-style buckle; Other
sv: Fönsternätets spärrmekanism: Spänne med kamlås; Spak; Inget spärrlås (fast); Utlösningsrem; Tryckknapp; Snabbstift; Vridlås; Spänne i säkerhetsbältesstil; Övrigt
zh-CN: 车窗防护网锁扣机构: 凸轮扣; 杠杆; 无插销（固定）; 拉带释放; 按钮式; 快拔销; 旋转插销; 安全带式插扣; 其他
vi: Cơ chế chốt lưới cửa sổ: Khóa gài; Đòn bẩy; Không có chốt (cố định); Dây kéo mở; Nút nhấn; Chốt cài nhanh; Chốt xoay; Khóa kiểu dây an toàn; Khác
ro-RO: Mecanismul de închidere al plasei pentru geam: Cataramă cu camă; Pârghie; Fără închizătoare (fix); Eliberare cu curea de tragere; Buton; Știft rapid; Închizătoare rotativă; Cataramă tip centură de siguranță; Altele
cs: Mechanismus západky okenní sítě: Samosvorná spona; Páka; Bez západky (pevné); Uvolnění zatažením za popruh; Tlačítko; Rychloupínací čep; Otočná západka; Spona typu bezpečnostního pásu; Jiné
fi: Ikkunaverkon salpamekanismi: Lukkosolki; Vipu; Ei salpaa (kiinteä); Vetohihnan vapautus; Painike; Pikalukitustappi; Pyörösalpa; Turvavyötyylinen solki; Muu
ko: 창문 방충망 잠금 장치: 캠 버클; 레버; 래치 없음(고정형); 풀 스트랩 릴리스; 푸시 버튼; 퀵 핀; 로터리 래치; 안전벨트형 버클; 기타
pt-PT: Mecanismo de fecho da rede de janela: Fivela de came; Alavanca; Sem trinco (fixo); Abertura por fita; Botão de pressão; Pino de libertação rápida; Trinco rotativo; Fivela tipo cinto de segurança; Outro
hr-HR: Mehanizam za zatvaranje prozorske mreže: Stezna kopča; Poluga; Bez bravice (fiksno); Otpuštanje poteznom trakom; Pritisni gumb; Zatik za brzo otpuštanje; Okretna bravica; Kopča u stilu sigurnosnog pojasa; Ostalo
bg-BG: Механизъм за заключване на мрежата на прозореца: Закопчалка с притискане; Лост; Без резе (фиксирано); Освобождаване с издърпване на лента; Бутон; Щифт за бързо освобождаване; Въртящо се резе; Закопчалка тип предпазен колан; Друго